Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1462.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 525.1. Broadcast of Interscholastic Athletic Competitions.--(a) Notwithstanding any policy of the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association, in any interscholastic athletic competition in this Commonwealth, the visiting team for a school entity shall have the same rights to provide radio broadcasting, video streaming and telegraphic 1234567891011121314151617181920 play-by-play accounts as the home team for a school entity if the visiting team meets any of the following criteria:(1) The visiting team has a valid agreement to provide radio broadcasting, video streaming or telegraphic play-by-play accounts between a media organization and the board of school directors of the school entity.(2) The visiting team has a curricular program for secondary school students that typically provides radio broadcasting, video streaming or telegraphic play-by-play for the visiting team's home games.(b) The provisions of this section shall apply to interscholastic athletic competitions beginning in the 2025-2026 school year.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Interscholastic athletic competition" shall mean an athletic competition conducted between or among school entities situated in counties of the second class, second class A, third class, fourth class, fifth class, sixth class, seventh class and eighth class."Nonpublic school" shall mean as defined in section 923.3-A(b)."Public school" shall mean a school district, charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school operating within this Commonwealth."School entity" shall mean a public school or nonpublic school that provides interscholastic athletic opportunities for secondary school students and is a member of the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association.20250HB1462PN1722 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Secondary school student" shall mean a student who attends a school entity in grades seven through twelve.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1462PN1722 - 3 - 123